Washington statutes.
RCW 2.36.072

Determination of juror qualification—Written or electronic declaration.

(1) Each court shall establish a means to preliminarily determine by a written or electronic declaration signed under penalty of perjury by the person summoned, the qualifications set forth in RCW 2.36.070 of each person summoned for jury duty prior to their appearance at the court to which they are summoned to serve.

(2) An electronic signature may be used in lieu of a written signature.

(3) "Electronic signature" means an electric sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with a document and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the document.

(4) Upon receipt by the summoning court of a written declaration stating that a declarant does not meet the qualifications set forth in RCW 2.36.070, that declarant shall be excused from appearing in response to the summons. If a person summoned to appear for jury duty fails to sign and return a declaration of his or her qualifications to serve as a juror prior to appearing in response to a summons and is later determined to be unqualified for one of the reasons set forth in RCW 2.36.070, that person shall not be entitled to any compensation as provided in RCW 2.36.150. Information provided to the court for preliminary determination of statutory qualification for jury duty may only be used for the term such person is summoned and may not be used for any other purpose, except that the court, or designee, may report a change of address or nondelivery of summons of persons summoned for jury duty to the county auditor.

[ 2009 c 330 s 1; 1993 c 408 s 9.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—1993 c 408: See notes following RCW 2.36.054.